District of Columbia statutes.
26-1161.10

Authority of Commissioner to issue regulations.

The Commissioner, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-172, § 11, 61 DCR 12577